Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1639.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8504(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 8504. Certificate of compliance required.* * *(b) Applicability.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:* * *(4) A highly automated vehicle that has been purchased or leased by a person and requires the presence of a human driver who is able to resume all or part of the dynamic driving task or respond to a request to intervene. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the operation on a highway of this Commonwealth of a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system capable of performing the 123456789101112131415161718 entire dynamic driving task within its operational design domain while a human driver is present is lawful.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1639PN1989 - 2 - 123